Hawaii statutes.
§501-140 Indorsement of and notices to
plaintiff's attorney. The name and address of the plaintiff's attorney
shall in all cases be indorsed upon the writ, where an attachment is made. The
attorney is deemed to be the attorney of the plaintiff until written notice
that the attorney has ceased to be such is filed for registration by the
plaintiff. [L 1903, c 56, §75; RL 1925, §3264; RL 1935, §5073; RL 1945, §12673;
RL 1955, §342-73; HRS §501-140; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next